Wisconsin, session 2025, AB850.
do enact as follows:AB850,13Section 1. 93.425 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB850,2,5493.425 (3) Of the moneys appropriated under s. 20.115 (3) (b), the center for 1international agribusiness marketing shall ensure that $2,500,000 is expended for 2the objective specified in sub. (2) (a), $1,250,000 is expended for the objective 3specified in sub. (2) (b), and $1,250,000 is expended for the objective specified in 4sub. (2) (c). The center may not expend more than $1,000,000 under the program in 5any fiscal year.AB850,26Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB850,2,107(1) The authorized FTE positions for the department of agriculture, trade and 8consumer protection are increased by 1.0 GPR position, to be funded from the 9appropriation under s. 20.115 (3) (b), for the purpose of program administration for 10the center for international agribusiness marketing.AB850,311Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB850,2,1812(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 13of agriculture, trade and consumer protection under s. 20.115 (3) (b), the dollar 14amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $1,073,400 for the purpose for which 15the appropriation is made. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation 16to the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection under s. 20.115 (3) 17(b), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $1,097,900 for the 18purpose for which the appropriation is made.AB850,2,1919